Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Perfection and Priority.
Sec. 45.29.317.
Interests that take priority over or take free of security interest or agricultural lien.

A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of a person

entitled to priority under AS

45.29.322

; and

except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, that becomes a lien creditor before the earlier of the time

the security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or

a financing statement covering the collateral is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

A licensee of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.320

and

45.29.321

, if a person files a financing statement with respect to a purchase money security interest before or within 20 days after the debtor receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor that arise between the time the security interest attaches and the time of filing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am §§ 107, 108 ch 44 SLA 2009; am §§ 12, 13 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), added “tangible” preceding “documents, goods, instruments”; in (d), added “electronic documents,” preceding “general intangibles”.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (b), substituted “or a certificated security” for “or a security certificate”; in (d), substituted “of collateral” for “of accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, general intangibles, or investment property”, and inserted “tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or” following “other than”.

Sec. 45.29.318.
No interest retained in right to payment that is sold; rights and title of seller of account or chattel paper with respect to creditors and purchasers.

A debtor that has sold an account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note does not retain a legal or equitable interest in the collateral sold.

For purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of an account or chattel paper from, a debtor that has sold an account or chattel paper, while the buyer’s security interest is unperfected, the debtor is considered to have rights and title to the account or chattel paper identical to those the debtor sold.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.319.
Rights and title of consignee with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, for purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of goods from, a consignee, while the goods are in the possession of the consignee, the consignee is considered to have rights and title to the goods identical to those the consignor had or had power to transfer.

For purposes of determining the rights of a creditor of a consignee, law other than this chapter determines the rights and title of a consignee while goods are in the consignee’s possession if, under AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

, a perfected security interest held by the consignor would have priority over the rights of the creditor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.320.
Buyer of goods.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a buyer in ordinary course of business, other than a person buying farm products from a person engaged in farming operations, takes free of a security interest created by the buyer’s seller, even if the security interest is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a buyer of goods from a person who used or bought the goods for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes takes free of a security interest, even if perfected, if the buyer buys

without knowledge of the security interest;

for value;

primarily for the buyer’s personal, family, or household purposes; and

before the filing of a financing statement covering the goods.

To the extent that it affects the priority of a security interest over a buyer of goods under (b) of this section, the period of effectiveness of a filing made in the jurisdiction in which the seller is located is governed by AS

45.29.316(a)

and (b).

A buyer in ordinary course of business buying oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead or after extraction takes free of an interest arising out of an encumbrance.

The provisions of (a) and (b) of this section do not affect a security interest in goods in the possession of the secured party under AS

45.29.313

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.321.
Licensee of general intangible and lessee of goods in ordinary course of business.

In this section, “licensee in ordinary course of business” means a person who becomes a licensee of a general intangible in good faith, without knowledge that the license violates the rights of another person in the general intangible, and in the ordinary course from a person in the business of licensing general intangibles of that kind. A person becomes a licensee in the ordinary course if the license to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the licensor is engaged or with the licensor’s own usual or customary practices.

A licensee in ordinary course of business takes its rights under a nonexclusive license free of a security interest in the general intangible created by the licensor even if the security interest is perfected and the licensee knows of its existence.

A lessee in ordinary course of business takes its leasehold interest free of a security interest in the goods created by the lessor even if the security interest is perfected and the lessee knows of its existence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.322.
Priorities among conflicting security interests in and agricultural liens on same collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

conflicting perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection; priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection;

a perfected security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting unperfected security interest or agricultural lien;

the first security interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

For the purposes of (a)(1) of this section, the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral

is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds; and

supported by a supporting obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in the supporting obligation.

Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, a security interest in collateral that qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under AS

45.29.327

,

45.29.328

,

45.29.329

,

45.29.330

, or

45.29.331

also has priority over a conflicting security interest in

supporting obligation for the collateral; and

proceeds of the collateral if

the security interest in proceeds is perfected;

the proceeds are cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral; and

in the case of proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating to the collateral.

Subject to (e) of this section and except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, if a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights is perfected by a method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

The provisions of (d) of this section apply only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights.

The provisions of (a) — (e) of this section are subject to

the provisions of (g) of this section and the other provisions of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

;

AS

45.04.210

with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank;

AS

45.05.118

with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person; and

AS

45.29.110

with respect to a security interest arising under AS 45.02 or AS 45.12.

A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.323.
Future advances.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, for purposes of determining the priority of a perfected security interest under AS

45.29.322(a)(1)

, perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to the extent that the security interest secures an advance that

is made while the security interest is perfected only

under AS

45.29.309

when it attaches; or

temporarily under AS

45.29.312(e)

, (f), or (g); and

not made pursuant to a commitment entered into before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under AS

45.29.309

or

45.29.312(e)

, (f), or (g).

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, a security interest is subordinate to the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor to the extent that the security interest secures an advance made more than 45 days after the person becomes a lien creditor unless the advance is made

without knowledge of the lien; or

pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lien.

The provisions of (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a security interest held by a secured party that is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a buyer of goods other than a buyer in ordinary course of business takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of

the time the secured party acquires knowledge of the buyer’s purchase; or

45 days after the purchase.

The provisions of (d) of this section do not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the buyer’s purchase and before the expiration of the 45-day period.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a lessee of goods, other than a lessee in ordinary course of business, takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of

the time the secured party acquires knowledge of the lease; or

45 days after the lease contract becomes enforceable.

The provisions of (f) of this section do not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lease and before the expiration of the 45-day period.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of future advances clauses under UCC Article 9, 90 ALR4th 859.

Sec. 45.29.324.
Priority of purchase money security interests.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a perfected purchase money security interest in goods other than inventory or livestock has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same goods, and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.327

, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority if the purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the collateral or within 20 days thereafter.

Subject to (c) of this section and except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a perfected purchase money security interest in inventory has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same inventory, has priority over a conflicting security interest in chattel paper or an instrument constituting proceeds of the inventory and in proceeds of the chattel paper if so provided in AS

45.29.330

, and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.327

, also has priority in identifiable cash proceeds of the inventory to the extent the identifiable cash proceeds are received on or before the delivery of the inventory to a buyer if

the purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the inventory;

the purchase money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

the holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within five years before the debtor receives possession of the inventory; and

the notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in inventory of the debtor and describes the inventory.

The provisions of (b)(2) — (4) of this section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of inventory if the purchase money security interest is

perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

temporarily perfected without filing or possession under AS

45.29.312(f)

before the beginning of the 20-day period under AS

45.29.312(f)

.

Subject to (e) of this section and except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a perfected purchase money security interest in livestock that are farm products has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same livestock, and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.327

, a perfected security interest in their identifiable proceeds and identifiable products in their unmanufactured states also has priority if

the purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the livestock;

the purchase money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

the holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within six months before the debtor receives possession of the livestock; and

the notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in livestock of the debtor and describes the livestock.

The provisions of (d)(2) — (4) of this section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of livestock if the purchase money security interest is

perfected by filing before the date of the filing; or

temporarily perfected without filing or possession under AS

45.29.312(f)

before the beginning of the 20-day period under AS

45.29.312(f)

.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, a perfected purchase-money security interest in software has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same collateral, and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.327

, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority to the extent that the purchase money security interest in the goods in which the software was acquired for use has priority in the goods and proceeds of the goods under this section.

If more than one security interest qualifies for priority in the same collateral under (a), (b), (d), or (f) of this section,

a security interest securing an obligation incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral has priority over a security interest securing an obligation incurred for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of collateral; and

in all other cases, AS

45.29.322(a)

applies to the qualifying security interests.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.325.
Priority of security interests in transferred collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a security interest created by a debtor is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral created by another person if

the debtor acquired the collateral subject to the security interest created by the other person;

the security interest created by the other person was perfected when the debtor acquired the collateral; and

there is no period after the events described in (1) and (2) of this subsection when the security interest is unperfected.

The provisions of (a) of this section subordinate a security interest only if the security interest

otherwise would have priority solely under AS

45.29.322(a)

or

45.29.324

; or

arose solely under AS

45.02.711(c)

or AS

45.12.508(e)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.326.
Priority of security interests created by new debtor.

Subject to (b) of this section, a security interest that is created by a new debtor in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and that is perfected solely by a filed financing statement that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of AS

45.29.316(i)(1)

or

45.29.508

is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral that is perfected other than by a financing statement described in this subsection.

The other provisions of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

determine the priority among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected by filed financing statements described in (a) of this section. However, if the security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting security interests rank according to priority in time of the new debtor’s having become bound.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 14 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), inserted “in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and” following “created by a new debtor”, inserted “solely” following “perfected”, substituted “that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of AS

45.29.316(i)(1)

or

45.29.508

” for “that is effective solely under AS

45.29.508

in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights” and “described in this subsection” for “that is effective solely under AS 45.29.508”, made a stylistic change; in the first sentence of (b), substituted “described in (a) of this section” for “that are effective solely under AS 45.29.508”.

Sec. 45.29.327.
Priority of security interests in deposit account.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

a security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under AS

45.29.104

has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control;

except as otherwise provided in (3) and (4) of this section, security interests perfected by control under AS

45.29.314

rank according to priority in time of obtaining control;

except as otherwise provided in (4) of this section, a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party;

a security interest perfected by control under AS

45.29.104(a)(3)

has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.328.
Priority of security interests in investment property.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

a security interest held by a secured party having control of investment property under AS

45.29.106

has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the investment property;

except as otherwise provided in (3) and (4) of this section, conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which has control under AS

45.29.106

rank according to priority in time, if the collateral is

a security, of obtaining control;

a security entitlement carried in a securities account and if the secured party obtained control

under AS

45.08.106(d)(1)

, of the secured party’s becoming the person for which the securities account is maintained;

under AS

45.08.106(d)(2)

, of the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the secured party’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or

through another person under AS

45.08.106(d)(3)

, of the time on which priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or

a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, of the satisfaction of the requirement for control specified in AS

45.29.106

(b)(2) with respect to commodity contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary;

a security interest held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party;

a security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party;

a security interest in a certificated security in registered form that is perfected by taking delivery under AS

45.29.313(a)

and not by control under AS

45.29.314

has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control;

conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary that are perfected without control under AS

45.29.106

rank equally;

in all other cases, priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed by AS

45.29.322

and

45.29.323

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.329.
Priority of security interests in letter-of-credit right.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same letter-of-credit right:

a security interest held by a secured party having control of the letter-of-credit right under AS

45.29.107

has priority to the extent of its control over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control;

security interests perfected by control under AS

45.29.314

rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.330.
Priority of purchaser of chattel paper or instrument.

A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper that is claimed merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if

in good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under AS

45.29.105

; and

the chattel paper does not indicate that it has been assigned to an identified assignee other than the purchaser.

A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper that is claimed other than merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under AS

45.29.105

in good faith, in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.327

, a purchaser having priority in chattel paper under (a) or (b) of this section also has priority in proceeds of the chattel paper to the extent that

AS

45.29.322

provides for priority in the proceeds; or

the proceeds consist of the specific goods covered by the chattel paper or cash proceeds of the specific goods even if the purchaser’s security interest in the proceeds is unperfected.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.331(a)

, a purchaser of an instrument has priority over a security interest in the instrument perfected by a method other than possession if the purchaser gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

For purposes of (a) and (b) of this section, the holder of a purchase money security interest in inventory gives new value for chattel paper constituting proceeds of the inventory.

For purposes of (b) and (d) of this section, if chattel paper or an instrument indicates that it has been assigned to an identified secured party other than the purchaser, a purchaser of the chattel paper or instrument has knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.331.
Priority of rights of purchasers of instruments, documents, and securities under other chapters; priority of interests in financial assets and security entitlements under AS 45.08.

This chapter does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security. These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in AS 45.03, AS 45.07, and AS 45.08.

This chapter does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under AS 45.08.

Filing under this chapter does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders, purchasers, or persons described in (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.332.
Transfer of money; transfer of funds from deposit account.

A transferee of money takes the money free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.333.
Priority of certain liens arising by operation of law.

In this section, “possessory lien” means an interest, other than a security interest or an agricultural lien,

that secures payment or performance of an obligation for services or materials furnished with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course of the person’s business;

that is created by statute or rule of law in favor of the person; and

whose effectiveness depends on the person’s possession of the goods.

A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security interest in the goods unless the lien is created by a statute that expressly provides otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.334.
Priority of security interests in fixtures and crops.

A security interest under this chapter may be created in goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures. A security interest does not exist under this chapter in ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

This chapter does not prevent creation of an encumbrance upon fixtures under real property law.

In cases not governed by (d) — (h) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the related real property other than the debtor.

Except as otherwise provided in (h) of this section, a perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property and

the security interest is a purchase money security interest;

the interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures; and

the security interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or within 20 days after the goods become fixtures.

A perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if

the debtor has an interest of record in the real property or is in possession of the real property and the security interest

is perfected by a fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record; and

has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner;

before the goods become fixtures, the security interest is perfected by a method permitted by this chapter and the fixtures are readily removable

factory or office machines;

equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real property; or

replacements of domestic appliances that are consumer goods;

the conflicting interest is a lien on the real property obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the security interest was perfected by a method permitted by this chapter; or

the security interest is

created in a manufactured home in a manufactured home transaction; and

perfected under a statute described in AS

45.29.311(a)(2)

.

A security interest in fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if

the encumbrancer or owner has, in an authenticated record, consented to the security interest or disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

the debtor has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner.

The priority of the security interest under (f)(2) of this section continues for a reasonable time if the debtor’s right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner terminates.

A mortgage is a construction mortgage to the extent that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land, including the acquisition cost of the land if a recorded mortgage so indicates. Except as otherwise provided in (e) and (f) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a construction mortgage if the mortgage is recorded before the goods become fixtures and the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. A mortgage has this priority to the same extent as a construction mortgage to the extent that it is given to refinance a construction mortgage.

A perfected security interest in crops growing on real property has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property.

The provisions of (i) of this section prevail over an inconsistent statute unless that statute contains an exemption that refers specifically to this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.335.
Accessions.

A security interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral that becomes an accession.

If a security interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an accession, the security interest remains perfected in the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, the other provisions of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

determine the priority of a security interest in an accession.

A security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest in the whole that is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate of title statute under AS

45.29.311(b)

.

After default, subject to AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

, a secured party may remove an accession from other goods if the security interest in the accession has priority over the claims of every person having an interest in the whole.

A secured party that removes an accession from other goods under (e) of this section shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of a physical injury to the whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the holder or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by the absence of the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.336.
Commingled goods.

In this section, “commingled goods” means goods that are physically united with other goods in a manner so that their identity is lost in a product or mass.

A security interest does not exist in commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a product or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

If collateral becomes commingled goods, a security interest attaches to the product or mass.

If a security interest in collateral is perfected before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest that attaches to the product or mass under (c) of this section is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, the other provisions of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

determine the priority of a security interest that attaches to the product or mass under (c) of this section.

If more than one security interest attaches to the product or mass under (c) of this section, the following rules determine priority:

a security interest that is perfected under (d) of this section has priority over a security interest that is unperfected at the time the collateral becomes commingled goods;

if more than one security interest is perfected under (d) of this section, the security interests rank equally in proportion to the value of the collateral at the time it became commingled goods.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.337.
Priority of security interests in goods covered by certificate of title.

If, while a security interest in goods is perfected by a method under the law of another jurisdiction, this state issues a certificate of title that does not show that the goods are subject to the security interest or contain a statement that the goods may be subject to security interests not shown on the certificate,

a buyer of the goods, other than a person in the business of selling goods of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the goods after issuance of the certificate and without knowledge of the security interest; and

the security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security interest in the goods that attaches, and is perfected under AS

45.29.311(b)

after issuance of the certificate and without the conflicting secured party’s knowledge of the security interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.338.
Priority of security interest or agricultural lien perfected by filed financing statement providing certain incorrect information.

If a security interest or agricultural lien is perfected by a filed financing statement providing information described in AS

45.29.516(b)(5)

that is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed,

the security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to a conflicting perfected security interest in the collateral to the extent that the holder of the conflicting security interest gives value in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information; and

a purchaser, other than a secured party, of the collateral takes free of the security interest or agricultural lien to the extent that, in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information, the purchaser gives value and, in the case of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a security certificate, receives delivery of the collateral.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 109 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (2), added “tangible” preceding “chattel paper,” and preceding “documents, goods, instruments”.

Sec. 45.29.339.
Priority subject to subordination.

This chapter does not preclude subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.340.
Effectiveness of right of recoupment or setoff against deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, a bank with which a deposit account is maintained may exercise a right of recoupment or setoff against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, the application of this chapter to a security interest in a deposit account does not affect a right of recoupment or setoff of the secured party as to a deposit account maintained with the secured party.

The exercise by a bank of a setoff against a deposit account is ineffective against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account that is perfected by control under AS

45.29.104(a)(3)

if the setoff is based on a claim against the debtor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.341.
Bank’s rights and duties with respect to deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.340(c)

, and unless the bank otherwise agrees in an authenticated record, a bank’s rights and duties with respect to a deposit account maintained with the bank are not terminated, suspended, or modified by

the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the deposit account;

the bank’s knowledge of the security interest; or

the bank’s receipt of instructions from the secured party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.342.
Bank’s right to refuse to enter into or disclose existence of control agreement.

This chapter does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind described in AS

45.29.104(a)(2)

, even if its customer so requests or directs. A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to do so by its customer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)